West Virginia, session 2025, SB638.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Chapter 5. General Powers and Authority of the Governor, Secretary of State and Attorney General; Board of Public Works; Miscellaneous Agencies, Commissions, Offices, Programs, Etc. Article 10. West Virginia Public Employees Retirement Act. §5-10-22o. Cost-of-living provision for annuitants at least 60 years of age and retired at least five years. Beginning on July 1, 2025, as an additional supplement to other retirement allowances provided, any annuitant who is at least 60 years of age and who has been receiving an annuity from the retirement system for at least five years shall receive a cost-of-living adjustment in his or her monthly annuity in an amount equal to the annual increase in the consumer price index as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. Chapter 18. Education. Article 7A. State Teachers Retirement System. §18-7A-26z. Cost-of-living provision for annuitants at least 60 years of age and retired at least five years. Beginning on July 1, 2025, as an additional supplement to other retirement allowances provided, any annuitant who is at least 60 years of age and who has been receiving an annuity from the retirement system for at least five years shall receive a cost-of-living adjustment in his or her monthly annuity in an amount equal to the increase in the consumer price index as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.